Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 10
POLICE OFFICERS' AND FIREFIGHTERS'
PENSION REFORM COMMISSION

31-31-1001. Police officers' and firefighters' pension reform commission - creation - duties. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 939, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2000:

(1) amended, p. 116, § 3, effective March 15.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 190, § 27, effective March 22.

L. 2010:

(3) added, (SB 10-213), ch. 375, p. 1763, § 10, effective June 7.

L. 2018:

Entire section repealed, (SB 18-200), ch. 370, p. 2264, § 29, effective June 4.

31-31-1002. Volunteer firefighter pension plans study. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (SB 15-029), ch. 285, p. 1168, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2018:

Entire section repealed, (SB 18-200), ch. 370, p. 2264, § 30, effective June 4.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-200, see section 1 of chapter 370, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.